Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Attachment of Personal Property

§ 3251.
Attachment or levy of execution by filing.

When personal property is taken upon a writ of attachment or execution, the officer serving such process may lodge a copy of the same, with his or her return, in the office or offices proper for the filing of a financing statement to perfect a security interest in such property under 9A V.S.A. § 9-401. Such lodgment shall hold the property against all subsequent sales, attachments, or executions as if it had been actually removed and taken into the possession of the officer, and different officers thereafter may serve in like manner other writs of attachment or execution so as to create a valid subordinate lien upon the same property.
Where such process is required by this section to be lodged in any office other than that of the town clerk in the town where the property is found, it shall be sufficient if the officer sends a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the appropriate office.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 89, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3252.
Recording by clerk.

When a copy of a writ of attachment upon which personal property is attached is lodged in the office of a town clerk, he or she shall enter in a book to be kept by him or her, in alphabetical order, the names of the parties, the date of the writ, the time when and the court to which the same is returnable, and the amount demanded.

§§ 3253,
3254.
Repealed. 1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3255.
Taking possession with or without filing.

An officer, having attached personal property by lodging a copy in the appropriate office as provided in section 3251 of this title shall thereafter remove the property so attached or take it into his or her possession whenever the care, safety, or preservation of the property so requires, or he or she may accept a receipt for the same. In either case he or she shall withdraw the copy from the office where it was lodged, except that in a mixed attachment of real and personal property he or she shall make and cause to be recorded a certificate stating either that the personal property attached has been taken into his or her possession or receipted. Where the copy was originally lodged by mail, as provided in section 3251 of this title, such withdrawal or recording may also be accomplished by mail.

The officer taking personal property as provided in this chapter may remove the same and take it into his or her possession, in which case he or she need not leave a copy of the attachment or execution in any office of record.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 90, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3256.
Custody of attached property; penalties.

When an officer has attached personal property and taken it into his or her custody and chained, locked, or otherwise secured the same, a person, except another officer duly authorized, shall not interfere with the first named officer’s custody of such property.
A person who violates the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than $100.00 or be imprisoned not more than 60 days, or both.

§ 3257.
Buildings erected by mortgagor or lessee.

An officer levying attachment of buildings or structures erected by a mortgagor or lessee, in addition to the copy lodged in the town clerk’s office, shall serve upon the mortgagee or lessor a like true and attested copy of the process, with a description of the property, and the return of the officer thereon, as is provided for the attachment of personal property held by a person as lessee or bailee.
Upon sale on execution, the vendee shall succeed to the rights of the original lessee or mortgagor to the property.